Maryland, session 2026, HB0784.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–11A–10.
(c) A leaseholder may not:
(1) Place shellfish, bags, nets, or structures on submerged aquatic
vegetation without prior written approval from the Department;
(2) Plant or harvest shellfish within 500 yards of any stationary blind or
blind site that is occupied and being used for hunting migratory waterfowl;
(3) Sublease a lease;
(4) Transfer a lease without the approval of the Department;
(5) Harvest shellfish outside the hours established by the Department in
regulation; or
– 1 –

Ch. 255 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) Place unlawfully harvested oysters on a lease.
(c–1) In approving the placement of shellfish, bags, nets, or structures on
submerged aquatic vegetation under subsection (c)(1) of this section, the Department:
(1) May not authorize harvesting by dredge in areas where submerged
aquatic vegetation is present;
(2) Shall authorize for water column leases the placement of shellfish,
bags, nets, or structures in at least 10% of the area where submerged aquatic vegetation is
present; and
(3) Shall authorize harvest by diving in areas on any submerged land lease
where submerged aquatic vegetation is present.
Chapter 238 of the Acts of 2019, as amended by Chapter 113 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2019. It shall remain effective for a period of [8] 11 years and 1 month and, at the end
of June 30, [2027] 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –